South Dakota, session 2026, SB206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $100,000 from the general fund, to the Legislative Research
Council, for the purpose of hiring a contractor to study state and federal laws, regulations,
and services related to the operation, administration, and implementation of an Internal
Revenue Code Section 457(e) length of service award program for volunteer firefighters and
emergency medical services personnel.
Section 2. The contractor shall present a report containing recommendations on
implementing a length of service award program for volunteer firefighters and emergency
medical services personnel to the Executive Board of the Legislative Research Council no later
than November 30, 2026.
Section 3. The director shall approve vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to
pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.